Oklahoma, session 2026, SB877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 858-307.2,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 858-307.2. A. Beginning November 1, 2004, as a
condition of renewal or reactivation of the a real estate license,
each licensee with the exception of those exempt as set out in this
section shall submit to the Oklahoma Real Estate Commission evidence
of completion of a specified number of hours of continuing education
courses approved by the Commission, within the thirty-six (36)
months immediately preceding the term for which the license is to be
issued. The number of hours, or its equivalent, required for each
licensed term shall be determined by the Commission and promulgated
by rule. Each licensee shall be required to complete and include as

part of said such continuing education a certain number of required
subjects as prescribed by rule.
B. The continuing education courses required by this section
shall be satisfied by courses approved by the Commission and offered
by:
1. The Commission;
2. A technology center school;
3. A college or university;
4. A private school;
5. The Oklahoma Association of Realtors, the National
Association of Realtors, or any affiliate thereof;
6. The Oklahoma Bar Association, American Bar Association, or
any affiliate thereof; or
7. An education provider.
C. The Commission shall maintain a list of courses which are
approved by the Commission.
D. The Commission shall not issue an active renewal license or
reactivate a license unless the continuing education requirement set
forth in this section is satisfied within the prescribed time
period.
E. The provisions of this section do not apply:
1. During the period a license is on inactive status;
2. To a licensee who holds a provisional sales associate
license;
3. To a nonresident licensee licensed in this state if the
licensee maintains a current license in another state or states and
has satisfied the continuing education requirement for license
renewal in that state or states. If the nonresident licensee is
ENR. S. B. NO. 877 Page 2

exempt from the continuing education requirements in all states
where the nonresident holds a license, the nonresident licensee
shall successfully complete this state’s continuing education
requirement for license renewal or reactivation; or
4. To a corporation, association, partnership, or branch
office.
F. The Commission shall require each licensee to receive a
specified number of hours of continuing education courses on deed
theft, as defined in Section 858-351 of this title. Each licensee
shall be required to complete such continuing education on or before
November 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 858-351, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 858-351. Unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, as used in Sections 858-351 through 858-363 of The
Oklahoma Real Estate License Code and Section 3 of this act:
1. “Broker” means a real estate broker, an associated broker
associate, sales associate, or provisional sales associate
authorized by a real estate broker to provide brokerage services;
2. “Brokerage services” means those services provided by a
broker to a party in a transaction;
3. “Deed theft” means to:
a. intentionally alter, falsify, forge, or misrepresent a
document relating to real property with the intent to
deceive, defraud, or unlawfully transfer or encumber
the ownership rights of the owner of the real
property,
b. misrepresent oneself as the owner or authorized
representative of the owner of real property in order
to obtain ownership or possession of such real
property, or
ENR. S. B. NO. 877 Page 3

c. with intent to defraud, take, obtain, steal, or
transfer title or ownership of real property by fraud,
forgery, larceny, or any other fraudulent or deceptive
practice;
4. “Firm” means a sole proprietor, corporation, association, or
partnership;
5. “Party” means a person who is a seller, buyer, landlord, or
tenant or a person who is involved in an option or exchange; and
4. 6. “Transaction” means an activity or process to buy, sell,
lease, rent, option, or exchange real estate. Such activities or
processes may include, without limitation, soliciting, advertising,
showing, or viewing real property, presenting offers or
counteroffers, entering into agreements, and closing such
agreements; and
5. “Firm” means a sole proprietor, corporation, association or
partnership.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 858-364 of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As part of each closing of a transaction, notification of the
signs and risks of deed theft, as defined in Section 858-351 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall be required to be given to
the buyer by a licensed real estate broker. The buyer shall confirm
receipt of such notification by affixing his or her signature to
such notification. The Oklahoma Real Estate Commission shall
promulgate rules to enact the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 877 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 877 Page 5